District of Columbia statutes.
35-124

Right to alter, amend, or repeal reserved.

Congress reserves the right to alter, amend, or repeal §§ 35-121 to 35-123.

July 25, 1935, 49 Stat. 498, ch. 415, § 4
1981 Ed., § 44-107.
1973 Ed., § 44-107.